Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-650
Combined tax rate; determination of employment; notice, method; review; redetermination; proceedings; appeal.

(1) The commissioner shall determine the rate of combined tax applicable to each employer pursuant to sections 48-649 to 48-649.04 and may determine, at any time during the year, whether services performed by an individual were employment or for an employer.

(2) Notice of a determination of liability or combined tax rate shall be promptly given to the employer by electronic notice or by mailing such notice to the employer's last-known address or the address of a representative designated in writing by the employer. The address of record of an employer on September 2, 2023, shall continue to be the address of record of such employer unless changed by the employer. An employer that becomes subject to the Employment Security Law on or after September 2, 2023, shall designate its preferred method of contact and designated representative, if any, at the time of its initial registration. An employer may change its election at any time.

(3) Any determination under subsection (1) of this section shall become conclusive and binding upon the employer unless, within thirty days after receiving notice, the employer files an appeal with the department in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commissioner. No employer shall have standing, in any proceeding involving his or her combined tax rate or combined tax liability, to contest the chargeability to his or her account of any benefits paid in accordance with a determination, redetermination, or decision pursuant to sections 48-629 to 48-644 except upon the ground that the services on the basis of which such benefits were found to be chargeable did not constitute services performed in employment for him or her and only in the event that he or she was not a party to such determination, redetermination, or decision or to any other proceedings under the Employment Security Law in which the character of such services was determined. A full and complete record shall be kept of all proceedings in connection with such hearing. All testimony at any such hearing shall be recorded but need not be transcribed unless there is a further appeal. The employer shall be promptly notified of a hearing officer's decision which shall become final unless the employer or the commissioner appeals within thirty days after the date of service of the decision of the hearing officer. The appeal shall otherwise be governed by the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 5, p. 391;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-707;

R.S.1943, § 48-650;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 35;

Laws 1985, LB 342, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 88;

Laws 1994, LB 1337, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 192, § 11;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 68;

Laws 2023, LB191, § 13.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

A petition for judicial review of the Nebraska Commissioner of Labor's determination of an employer's unemployment insurance contributions must be filed in the county where the first adjudicated hearing of a disputed claim took place. Metro Renovation v. State, 249 Neb. 337, 543 N.W.2d 715 (1996).

The Employment Security Law provides one avenue of judicial appeal when the dispute concerns benefit liability and another when the dispute concerns contribution liability. Northern Messenger v. Sorensen, 218 Neb. 846, 359 N.W.2d 787 (1984).

Judicial review of decision of the Nebraska Appeal Tribunal reviewing a decision under this section of the Nebraska Department of Labor, Division of Employment, may only be had in the District Court of Lancaster County. Whitehouse Energy Savers v. Hanlon, 214 Neb. 572, 334 N.W.2d 802 (1983).